hr-HR: Vrsta gasa (konverzija skutera): Poluzakretni gas; Gas nije uključen; Ulaz senzora za pomoć pri pedaliranju (PAS); Gas na palac; Zakretni gas; Ostalo
tr: Gaz kolu tipi (scooter dönüşümü): Yarım çevirmeli gaz; Gaz kolu dahil değil; Pedal destek sensörü (PAS) girişi; Başparmak gaz kolu; Çevirmeli gaz; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta ročice za plin (predelava skuterja): Ročica za plin s polovičnim zasukom; Ročica za plin ni vključena; Vhod za senzor pomoči pri vrtenju pedal (PAS); Ročica za plin na palec; Vrtljiva ročica za plin; Drugo
el: Τύπος γκαζιού (μετατροπή σκούτερ): Γκάζι μισής περιστροφής; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται γκάζι; Είσοδος αισθητήρα υποβοήθησης πεντάλ (PAS); Γκάζι αντίχειρα; Γκάζι περιστροφής; Άλλο
pt-PT: Tipo de acelerador (conversão de scooter): Acelerador de meia torção; Acelerador não incluído; Entrada do sensor de pedalada assistida (PAS); Acelerador de polegar; Acelerador de torção; Outro
lt-LT: Akceleratoriaus tipas (paspirtuko konversija): Pusiau pasukama greičio rankenėlė; Greičio rankenėlė nepridėta; Pedalų mynimo asistento (PAS) jutiklio įvestis; Nykščiu valdoma greičio rankenėlė; Pasukama greičio rankenėlė; Kita
pl: Typ manetki gazu (konwersja hulajnogi): Manetka półobrotowa; Brak manetki w zestawie; Czujnik wspomagania pedałowania (PAS); Manetka kciukowa; Manetka obrotowa; Inne
ko: 스로틀 유형(스쿠터 변환): 하프 트위스트 스로틀; 스로틀 미포함; 페달 어시스트 센서(PAS) 입력; 엄지 스로틀; 트위스트 스로틀; 기타
sk-SK: Typ škrtiacej klapky (konverzia kolobežky): Polovičná otočná plynová rukoväť; Bez plynovej rukoväte; Vstup pre snímač asistencie pedálovania (PAS); Palcová plynová páčka; Otočná plynová rukoväť; Iné
ro-RO: Tip de accelerație (conversie scuter): Accelerație cu jumătate de rotație; Fără accelerație inclusă; Intrare senzor de asistență la pedalare (PAS); Accelerație pentru degetul mare; Accelerație rotativă; Altele
th: ห้ามจำกัดความเร็วประเภท (สกู๊ตเตอร์ คอนคอน): คันเร่งแบบบิดครึ่งเดียว; ไม่มีคันเร่ง; อินพุตเซนเซอร์ช่วยปั่น (PAS); คันเร่งแบบกดด้วยนิ้วโป้ง; คันเร่งแบบบิด; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип дросселя (переоборудование скутера): Половинная ручка газа; Ручка газа не входит в комплект; Датчик системы помощи педалированию (PAS); Курок газа; Ручка газа; Другое
en: Throttle type (scooter conversion): Half-twist throttle; No throttle included; Pedal-assist sensor (PAS) input; Thumb throttle; Twist throttle; Other
pt-BR: Acelerador tipo (conversão de scooter): Acelerador de meia torção; Acelerador não incluído; Entrada do sensor de assistência ao pedal (PAS); Acelerador de polegar; Acelerador de torção; Outros
bg-BG: Тип ръкохватка на газта (при преустройство на скутер): Дросел на половин оборот; Не е включен дросел; Вход за сензор за подпомагане на педалите (PAS); Дросел за палец; Въртящ се дросел; Друго
hu: Gázkar típusa (robogó átalakítása): Félmarkolatos gázkar; Gázkar nélkül; Pedálszenzor (PAS) bemenet; Hüvelykujjas gázkar; Markolatos gázkar; Egyéb
fr: Type d’accélérateur (conversion de scooter): Accélérateur à demi-poignée; Aucun accélérateur inclus; Entrée de capteur d'assistance au pédalage (PAS); Accélérateur au pouce; Accélérateur à poignée rotative; Autre
nb: Type gasshåndtak (scooterkonvertering): Halv vrigass; Ingen gass inkludert; Inndata fra pedalassistentsensor (PAS); Tommelgass; Vrigass; Annet
es: Tipo de ralentizado (conversión scooter): Acelerador de medio giro; No incluye acelerador; Entrada de sensor de pedaleo asistido (PAS); Acelerador de pulgar; Acelerador de giro; Otro
zh-CN: 油门类型（滑板车改装套件）: 半扭式油门; 不含油门; 踏板辅助传感器 (PAS) 输入; 拇指油门; 扭动式油门; 其他
cs: Typ ovládání plynu (přestavba koloběžky): Rukojeť s polovičním otočením; Akcelerátor není součástí; Vstup pro snímač podpory šlapání (PAS); Palcový akcelerátor; Otočný akcelerátor; Ostatní
vi: Loại tay ga (chuyển đổi thành xe tay ga): Tay ga xoắn nửa vặn; Không kèm tay ga; Đầu vào cảm biến hỗ trợ đạp (PAS); Tay ga nhấn ngón cái; Tay ga vặn; Khác
de: Gasgriffart (Rollerumbau): Halbdrehgasgriff; Kein Gasgriff im Lieferumfang enthalten; Pedalunterstützungs-Sensor (PAS)-Eingang; Daumengasgriff; Drehgasgriff; Sonstige
ja: スロットルタイプ (スクーターコンバージョン): ハーフツイストスロットル; スロットルなし; ペダルアシストセンサー (PAS) 入力; サムスロットル; ツイストスロットル; その他
zh-TW: 油門類型 (滑板車改裝): 半轉把油門; 不含油門; 踏板輔助感測器 (PAS) 輸入; 拇指油門; 轉把油門; 其他
da: Gastype (scooterkonvertering): Halvdrejningsgashåndtag; Gashåndtag medfølger ikke; Indgang til pedalassist-sensor (PAS); Tommelfingergashåndtag; Drejningsgashåndtag; Andet
nl: Gashendel type (scooterconversie): Halve draaigashendel; Geen gashendel inbegrepen; Trapondersteuningssensor (PAS)-invoer; Duimgashendel; Draaigashendel; Overige
it: Tipo di acceleratore (conversione scooter): Acceleratore a mezza manopola; Acceleratore non incluso; Ingresso sensore di pedalata assistita (PAS); Acceleratore a pollice; Acceleratore a manopola; Altro
sv: Gaskontrolltyp (scooterkonvertering): Halv gashandtag; Inget gashandtag ingår; Ingång för pedalassistanssensor (PAS); Tumgas; Vridgas; Annat
fi: Kaasukahvan tyyppi (skootterin konversio): Puolikiertyvä kaasu; Kaasua ei sisälly; Poljinavustimen tunnistimen (PAS) tulo; Peukalokaasu; Kiertyvä kaasu; Muu